New York, session 2025-2026, A7135.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 819 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 819. Career explorations class. 1. The commissioner shall establish 4 a career explorations class to integrate academic and vocational educa- 5 tion, link secondary and post-secondary education and provide learning 6 activities and mentoring at the work site. Such class shall provide 7 students with school-based learning and work-based learning which shall 8 include, but not be limited to: 9 (a) career workshops to provide information on how to search for jobs 10 and/or internships in such student's industry of interest; 11 (b) guest speakers who shall be professionals from various industries 12 to give a brief synopsis of an average work day as well as what type of 13 employees their company employs; 14 (c) outside internships where every student participates in either one 15 summer internship or spends at least five days shadowing a professional; 16 (d) resume and cover letter writing to teach students to write a 17 competitive and comprehensive resume and cover letter; 18 (e) thank you letters to teach students to write and send proper thank 19 you notes after an interview; 20 (f) mock interviews to conduct a series of phone and face-to-face 21 interviews simulating the actual event; 22 (g) workplace etiquette to teach the basic principles of a profes- 23 sional environment in reference to mutual respect, appropriate attire, 24 language and behavior; and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07759-01-5 A. 7135 2 1 (h) SAT preparation and post-secondary school application and accept- 2 ance process. 3 2. Such class shall be called career explorations and shall be offered 4 in the spring semester or term of the freshman year of secondary school. 5 SAT preparation and post-secondary application and acceptance process 6 shall be offered in the fall semester or term of the junior year of 7 secondary school during the regular school day in the place of two elec- 8 tive classes. Such classes shall be held in a computer lab or the 9 computer section of the school library. 10 3. The department shall develop a system of performance reporting to 11 define measures of student, school and employer participation in career 12 awareness, career exposure, career exploration and work-based learning 13 activities. The department shall further establish, in collaboration 14 with the participating school districts, a system of performance indica- 15 tors and measures for assessing state and local progress and build a 16 foundation of core measures around which state and local information 17 systems can be built. 18 4. The department shall have one year from the effective date of this 19 section to assemble a curriculum entitled the "career explorations 20 class". Such new class shall be phased in by cities in the following 21 manner: 22 (a) first year, cities with a population of one million or more; 23 (b) second year, cities with a population between fifty thousand and 24 ninety-nine thousand nine hundred ninety-nine; 25 (c) third year, cities with a population between twenty thousand and 26 forty-nine thousand nine hundred ninety-nine; 27 (d) fourth year, all other cities not enumerated in this subdivision; 28 such that the largest cities in the state with the largest school 29 districts shall first implement the career explorations course and four 30 years after the effective date of this section, every school district in 31 New York state shall implement the career explorations course. 32 5. Such school districts which implement the career explorations class 33 outlined in subdivision one of this section shall receive additional 34 funding and training during such year; the funding of which shall be 35 derived from funds of the division of the lottery. 36 § 2. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 37 law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any 38 rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of this act on its 39 effective date are authorized to be made and completed on or before such 40 effective date.